apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="/eat__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eat</l>
        <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eat</l>
        <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eats</l>
        <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ate</l>
        <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaten</l>
        <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eating</l>
        <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eating</l>
        <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eating</l>
        <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fe/el__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>el</l>
        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>el</l>
        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>els</l>
        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>lt</l>
        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>lt</l>
        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eling</l>
        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eling</l>
        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eling</l>
        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>




 <pardef n="d/are__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>are</l>
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>are</l>
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ares</l>
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>urst</l>
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                       <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ared</l>
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e i="">

      <p>
        <l>ared</l>
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aring</l>
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aring</l>
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aring</l>
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/ight__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ight</l>
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ight</l>
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ights</l>
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ought</l>
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ought</l>
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ighting</l>
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ighting</l>
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ighting</l>
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fle/e__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="floodli/ght__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ght</l>
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ght</l>
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ghts</l>
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>t</l>
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>t</l>
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ghting</l>
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ghting</l>
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ghting</l>
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="feel dizzy" i=""><i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/><p><l><b/>dizzy</l><r><g><b/>dizzy</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="feel unfriendly" i=""><i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/><p><l><b/>unfriendly</l><r><g><b/>unfriendly</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="dare" i=""><i>d</i><par n="d/are__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="eat" i=""><par n="/eat__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="fight" i=""><i>f</i><par n="f/ight__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="feel" i=""><i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="flee" i=""><i>fle</i><par n="fle/e__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="light" i=""><i>li</i><par n="floodli/ght__vblex"/></e>
